Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1304.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 307(7) of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, is amended to read:Section 307. In case of death, compensation shall be computed on the following basis, and distributed to the following persons: Provided, That in no case shall the wages of the deceased be taken to be less than fifty per centum of the Statewide average weekly wage for purposes of this section:* * *(7) Whether or not there be dependents as aforesaid, the reasonable expense of burial, not exceeding [seven thousand 1234567891011121314151617181920 dollars ($7,000)] twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), which shall be paid by the employer or insurer directly to the undertaker (without deduction of any amounts theretofore paid for compensation or for medical expenses).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1304PN1658 - 2 - 123456